Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.260

Election of members of commodity board—Procedure.

(1) The elected members of every commodity board shall be elected by secret mail ballot under the supervision of the director. Elected producer members of the board shall be elected by a majority of the votes cast by the affected producers within the affected area, but if the marketing order or agreement provides for districts such producer members of the board shall be elected by a majority of the votes cast by the affected producers in the respective districts. Each affected producer within the affected area shall be entitled to one vote. Elected handler members of the board shall be elected by a majority of the votes cast by the affected handlers within the affected area, but if the marketing order or agreement provides for districts such handler members of the board shall be elected by a majority of the votes cast by the affected handlers in the respective districts. Each affected handler within the affected area shall be entitled to one vote.

If a nominee does not receive a majority of the votes on the first ballot a runoff election shall be held by mail in a similar manner between the two candidates for such position receiving the largest number of votes.

(2) Notice of every election for board membership shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the affected area defined in the order or agreement not less than ten days in advance of the date of such election. Not less than ten days prior to every election for board membership, the director shall mail a ballot of the candidates to each producer and handler entitled to vote whose name appears upon the list of affected parties or affected producers or handlers, whichever is applicable. Any other producer or handler entitled to vote may obtain a ballot by application to the director upon establishing his or her qualifications. Nonreceipt of a ballot by any person entitled to vote shall not invalidate the election of any board member.

[ 2002 c 313 s 27; 1985 c 261 s 10; 1961 c 256 s 26.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.